District of Columbia statutes.
7-1913

Reporting to Council.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council an annual report on this chapter, which shall at a minimum include the following:

(1)

A description of the specific actions taken to implement this chapter, including the staffing pattern and budget of the responsible administrative unit;

(2)

An analysis by fiscal year of:

(A)

The number of cases reported, investigations conducted, and reports substantiated;

(B)

The characteristics of both substantiated and unsubstantiated cases, including a breakdown by age, impairment, individual reporting, police involvement, services refused, and type of abuse, neglect, or exploitation involved;

(C)

The number of cases referred to court, the reasons for referral, their outcome, and associated court costs;

(D)

The type, amount, and cost of protective services provided;

(E)

The percentage of cost reimbursed by or recouped from 3rd parties;

(F)

The status of substantiated cases at the end of 90 days of services, and the average number of days of services per case;

(G)

The effectiveness with which government agencies and private organizations collaborate to investigate cases and administer protective services, including any proposals to improve coordination of efforts; and

(H)

The resources needed by the Department to conduct investigations and provide services as authorized by and required under this chapter; and

(3)

Any recommendations for amendments to this chapter.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-156, § 14, 32 DCR 13
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-67, § 2(l), 53 DCR 40

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2513.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-67, in the lead-in text, substituted “The Mayor shall submit to the Council an annual” for “No later than October 1, 1987, the Mayor shall prepare and submit to the Council a”; in pars. (2)(E) and (F), deleted “and” from the end; and added pars. (2)(G) and (H).

Editor's Notes

Delayed application of Law 5-156: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-1901.